Hawaii statutes.
§330-8 Use of certain chemical substances
as inhalants unlawful. It shall be unlawful for any person to use as an
inhalant any substance, not a "food" as defined in section 328-1,
which substance includes in its composition volatile organic solvents including
amylacetate, trichloroethylene, and acetone or any other chemical substance,
capable of producing upon inhalation any degree of intoxication; provided that
this section shall not apply to any person using as an inhalant any such
chemical substance pursuant to the direction of a physician. [L 1963, c 115, pt
of §2; Supp, §53-5.5; HRS §330-8; am L 1998, c 11, §18]

Cross References

Intoxicating compounds, see chapter 328E.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next